Maine, session 132, LD1346.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1967, c. 29, as amended by P&SL 1989, c. 19, is repealed.
Sec. 2. Transfer of assets of New Sharon Water District. The New Sharon
Water District shall expeditiously convey, assign and transfer to the Town of New Sharon,
for no consideration:
1. All physical and intangible assets of the New Sharon Water District, including all
cash, lands, water rights, waters, dams, reservoirs, mains, pipes, service pipes, hydrants,
gates, gate-boxes, fixtures, machinery, tools, apparatus, appliances, structures and any
other physical element necessary and convenient for providing pure water for domestic,
commercial, sanitary and municipal purposes; and
2. All existing contracts or other obligations between the New Sharon Water District
and any 3rd party. All property, contracts, obligations and franchises of the New Sharon
Water District must be conveyed subject to all debentures, bonds, mortgages, liens and
encumbrances thereon, all of which must be assumed by the Town of New Sharon.
Sec. 3. Contractual obligations not impaired. In order to avoid any
unconstitutional impairment of existing contractual rights, the Town of New Sharon and,
if necessary, the New Sharon Water District shall enter into any and all contractual
agreements necessary for the Town of New Sharon to fulfill any contractual obligations of
the New Sharon Water District, including any existing financial obligations to the New
Sharon Water District's bondholders.
Sec. 4. Pledge of revenues. In order to carry out the purposes of this Act and
notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 5772, the Town of New
Sharon is authorized to issue its notes or bonds in the form of either a general obligation
pledge or a revenue pledge, as the municipal officer may determine, to replace or refinance
any or all of the existing debts or obligations of the New Sharon Water District and is
authorized to deliver other instruments evidencing its assumption of the debts, obligations
and other liabilities of the New Sharon Water District without the need for any further
action or approval from the New Sharon select board or the voters of the Town of New
Sharon. Any notes or bonds or other instruments evidencing the town's assumption of the
Page 1 - 132LR1924(01)

413 debts, obligations and other liabilities of the New Sharon Water District may be issued in
424 the amounts necessary to pay the principal of, premium, if any, on and interest on the debts,
435 obligations and other liabilities of the New Sharon Water District and may mature up to
446 but not later than the stated maturity date of the debts, obligations and other liabilities of
457 the New Sharon Water District.
Sec. 5. Corporate successor to New Sharon Water District. For purposes of
assuming all debts and obligations of the New Sharon Water District, the Town of New
Sharon is the corporate successor to the New Sharon Water District upon the transfer of the
assets and obligations of the New Sharon Water District to the Town of New Sharon
pursuant to this Act.
Sec. 6. Referendum; effective date. This Act takes effect when approved only
for the purpose of permitting its submission to the legal voters within the Town of New
Sharon at a referendum called for that purpose and held after March 1, 2025, but within 3
years after the effective date of this Act. The referendum must be called by the municipal
officers of the town and must be held at the town's regular voting places. The referendum
must be called, advertised and conducted according to the law relating to municipal
elections. The registrar shall make a complete list of all the eligible voters of the Town of
New Sharon. The list prepared by the registrar governs the eligibility of a voter. For the
purpose of registration of voters, the registrar of voters must be in session the regular
workday preceding the referendum. The subject matter of this Act is reduced to the
following question:
"Do you favor the New Sharon Water District turning over all assets,
liabilities and responsibilities to the Town of New Sharon for the purposes
of providing drinking water and fire protection to existing and future
customers?"
The voters shall indicate by a cross or check mark placed against the word "Yes" or
"No" their opinion of the same. The results must be declared by the municipal officers of
the Town of New Sharon and due certificate of the results filed by the clerk with the
Secretary of State. This Act takes effect for all other purposes immediately upon its
approval by a majority of the legal voters of the Town of New Sharon voting at the
referendum. Failure to achieve the necessary approval in any referendum does not prohibit
subsequent referenda consistent with this section, as long as the referenda are held within
3 years after the effective date of this Act. If, after March 1, 2025, but prior to approval of
this Act, a referendum on the question specified in this section is held in accordance with
this section and a majority of the legal voters of the Town of New Sharon voting at the
referendum cast votes in favor of the question and due certificate of the results are filed
with the Secretary of State, this Act takes effect when approved.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.